md1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc

LEXICON Root						
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

med N3dekl;
al N3dekl;
liet N3dekl;
up N5dekl;
zvaigzn N5dekl;
cepur N5dekl;
nakt N6dekl;
aus N6dekl;
ac N6dekl;
ļaud N6deklPl;

LEXICON N3dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^us #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^us #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^um #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ū #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os #;

LEXICON N5dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^e #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^es #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ei #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ē #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^es #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ēm #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^es #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ēs #;

LEXICON N6dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^s #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ij #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^is #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^īm #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^is #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^īs #;

LEXICON N6deklPl					
+N+Pl+Nom:^is #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^īm #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^is #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^īs #;
